Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 33 COLORADO SURFACE COAL MINING RECLAMATION ACT
34-33-122. Inspections and monitoring.

For the purposes of administering and enforcing any permit under this article or of determining whether any person is in violation of any requirement of this article, the board shall require permittees to establish and maintain records of information relative to surface coal mining and reclamation operations which the board deems necessary in order for it or the office to monitor such operations.

For those surface coal mining and reclamation operations which affect or potentially affect surface water and groundwater, on or off the site, the office shall, to the extent it deems necessary and after consultation with the division of water resources, require the permittee to:

Establish monitoring sites to record the effect of the operations on the level and amount of such water;

Maintain records of well logs and borehole data;

Establish such monitoring sites to record precipitation in the area of the surface coal mining operation.

The office shall require such monitoring of surface and groundwater quality, both on and off the site, as it deems necessary to determine compliance by permittees with the water quality provisions of this article.

The authorized representative of the board or office, upon presentation of appropriate credentials, shall have the power to enter at reasonable times, and without delay, upon or through any surface coal mining and reclamation operations and to have access to and copy any record, wherever located, and to inspect any monitoring equipment or method of operation required under this article or any permit issued under this article.

Such inspections shall occur on an irregular basis, during times of operation at the mine, averaging not less than one partial inspection per month and one complete inspection per calendar quarter for each permitted surface coal mining and reclamation operation. Inspections may occur at any time at sites if a surface coal mining operation does not have a valid permit under this article or if there is reason to believe in a particular instance that significant environmental harm exists.

Such inspections shall occur without prior notice to the permittee or his agents or employees, except for necessary on-site meetings with the permittee, and shall include the filing of inspection reports on forms approved by the board.

Each permittee shall conspicuously maintain at the entrances to his surface coal mining and reclamation operations a clearly visible sign which sets forth the name, business address, and telephone number of the permittee and the permit number of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations.

Upon detection of a violation of any requirement of this article during an inspection, the authorized representative of the board or office shall forthwith issue a notice of violation to the operator in accordance with section 34-33-123.

Any person who is or may be adversely affected by a particular surface coal mining operation may request that an inspection for violations be held. Such request shall be acted upon by the office if it is in writing and if it contains sufficient basis for the allegation that a violation has occurred. When a state inspection is to be made as a result of such information, the office shall notify such person when the inspection is proposed to be carried out, and such person shall be allowed to accompany the inspector during the inspection if such person remains in the presence of and under the control, direction, and supervision of the inspector and if such person agrees to comply with all applicable state and federal safety rules and regulations.

Copies of any records, reports, inspection materials, or information obtained under this article by the board, except information identified as confidential pursuant to the provisions of this article, shall be made immediately available to the public at the office of mined land reclamation's office and at a convenient place in the area of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations.

No employee of the division performing any function or duty under this article 33 shall have a direct or indirect financial interest in any underground or surface coal mining operation. Whoever knowingly violates the provisions of this subsection (9) commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1287, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(4)(b) amended, p. 1682, § 4, effective June 16.

L. 92:

(1), IP(2), (3), (4)(a), and (6) to (8) amended, p. 1961, § 65, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(9) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3275, § 609, effective March 1, 2022.

34-33-123. Enforcement - civil and criminal penalties.

When, on the basis of any inspection, an authorized representative of the office determines that any condition or practices exist at a surface coal mining operation which is subject to this article or that any operator is in violation of any requirement of this article or any permit condition required by this article, which condition, practice, or violation also creates an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public, or is causing or can reasonably be expected to cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, such authorized representative shall immediately order a cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations or that portion thereof relevant to the condition, practice, or violation. Where such authorized representative finds that the ordered cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations will not completely abate the imminent danger or the significant imminent environmental harm, the representative shall, in addition to the cessation order, impose affirmative obligations on the operator requiring such operator to abate the imminent danger or the significant imminent environmental harm. The order shall specify a reasonable time in which such abatement shall be accomplished.

When, on the basis of any inspection, an authorized representative of the office determines that any operator is in violation of any requirement of this article or any permit condition required by this article, but such violation does not create an imminent danger to the health or safety of the public or cannot be reasonably expected to cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources, such authorized representative shall issue a notice of violation to the operator or a designated agent of the operator fixing a reasonable time, but not more than ninety days, for the abatement of the violation.

If the operator who is issued a notice of violation under subsection (2) of this section fails to abate the violation within the abatement period as originally set or subsequently extended, for good cause shown and upon written finding to that effect, the authorized representative of the office shall immediately order a cessation of the surface coal mining and reclamation operations or that portion thereof relevant to the violation.

Each notice of violation and cessation order issued pursuant to this section shall be on a written form approved by the board, shall be signed by the person issuing it, and shall set forth with reasonable specificity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the provisions of the permit, statute, or regulation allegedly violated, the steps necessary to abate the violation in the most expeditious manner possible, the period of time established for abatement, and a reasonable description of the portion of the surface coal mining and reclamation operation to which the notice or order applies. The notice of violation or cessation order shall also inform the operator that a civil penalty may be assessed for the violation, if any, and that the operator has the right to have review of the notice or order in public hearing before the board in accordance with section 34-33-124. The procedure which the operator must follow to obtain such a hearing on any matters contained in the notice of violation or cessation order shall be included in the notice or order. Each notice of violation or cessation order shall be served in a timely fashion on the operator, through his designated agent or management personnel at the mine, in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested.

Except as set forth in subsection (6) of this section, cessation orders issued under this section shall remain in effect until the condition, practice, or violation has been abated or until vacated, modified, or terminated in writing by an authorized representative of the office or by the board. An authorized representative of the office may vacate, modify, or terminate a cessation order for good cause and may extend the time for abatement if the failure to abate within the time previously fixed was not caused by lack of diligence on the part of the operator. An authorized representative of the office shall immediately terminate a cessation order by written notice to the permittee when such representative determines that all conditions, practices, or violations listed in the order have been abated.

Any notice of violation or cessation order issued pursuant to this section which requires cessation of mining, expressly or by necessary implication, shall automatically expire thirty days after service of the notice or order to the operator unless an informal hearing on the cessation of mining portion of the notice or order is held within such time at the site or within such reasonable proximity to the site that any viewings of the site can be conducted during the course of the hearing. Such hearing shall be presided over by the authorized representatives of the office and pursuant to such reasonable procedural rules as the board may adopt by regulation. The office shall either affirm, modify, vacate, or terminate the notice or order or grant temporary relief therefrom. The authorized representative of the office who originally ordered the cessation of mining shall not take part in any such decision. Such hearings may be waived by the operator to whom the order was issued, and the holding of or failure to hold such a hearing shall not affect such operator's right to board review under section 34-33-124.

When the office determines that a pattern of violations of any requirements of this article or any permit conditions required by this article exists or has existed and that such violations are caused by the unwarranted failure of the permittee to comply with any requirements of this article or any permit conditions or that such violations are willfully caused by the permittee, the office shall forthwith issue an order to the permittee to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked and shall provide opportunity for a public hearing before the board to be held in accordance with section 34-33-124 and pursuant to such rules and regulations the board may adopt.

Any operator who violates any permit condition or who violates any other provision of this article may be assessed a civil penalty by the division; except that, if such violation leads to the issuance of a cessation order under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, the civil penalty shall be assessed. Such penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars for each violation. Each day of continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of penalty assessments. In determining the amount of the penalty, consideration shall be given to the operator's history of previous violations at the particular surface coal mining operation, the seriousness of the violation, including any irreparable harm to the environment and any hazard to the health or safety of the public, whether the operator was negligent, and the demonstrated good faith of the operator charged in attempting to achieve rapid compliance after notification of the violation.

The office shall notify the operator in writing of the proposed amount of any civil penalty within thirty days after the issuance of a notice or order charging a violation. The operator shall have ten days after receipt of the proposed penalty within which to request, on a written form approved by the board, an assessment conference in which all relevant information concerning the violation and penalty, including all information which the operator may submit, shall be reviewed by the operator or an authorized representative and a conference officer who shall be an authorized representative of the office.

If the issues are resolved at the settlement conference, the conference officer shall prepare a settlement agreement, on a form approved by the board, which agreement shall be signed by the conference officer or his authorized representative and the operator charged with the violation. The settlement agreement shall provide, among other things, that, by paying the penalty as agreed, the operator waives all further right to review of the violation or penalty. The settlement agreement shall also require that the penalty, as agreed to, shall be paid within a certain time not to exceed thirty days from the date the agreement is signed by both parties. The settlement agreement shall not be effective if it is not signed by the operator or his authorized representative at the conference or within ten days thereafter.

If the operator does not request a settlement conference, if a settlement conference is requested and the issues are not resolved there, or if the penalty agreed to in the settlement conference is not paid within the prescribed time, the office shall order the penalty fixed at whatever amount it deems appropriate based on the criteria set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) and on all relevant information which was received at the assessment conference, if held, and it shall give the operator written notice of the amount of the fixed penalty. The notice and order shall be on a form approved by the board, shall require payment of the fixed penalty within thirty days after the receipt of the notice and order by the operator, and shall state the procedure which the operator must follow to obtain a hearing before the board on the fact of the violation or the penalty. The notice and order shall be served on the operator or a designated agent of the operator no later than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice or order describing the violation was originally issued.

Failure of the operator to forward the amount of the fixed penalty to the office and to request a public hearing in accordance with paragraph (f) of this subsection (8) shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of the penalty.

If the operator wishes to contest either the amount of the fixed penalty or the fact of the violation, the operator shall forward the amount of the fixed penalty to the office within thirty days after receipt of notice thereof for placement in an escrow account and request a public hearing before the board. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with section 34-33-124, and, when appropriate, the board shall consolidate such hearing with other proceedings under section 34-33-124. After such a public hearing has been held, the board shall make findings of fact and shall issue a written decision as to the occurrence of the violation and the amount of the civil penalty which is warranted, incorporating, when appropriate, an order therein requiring that the penalty be paid. Any hearing under this section shall be of record and shall be subject to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. Failure of the operator to pay the civil penalty ordered by the board within thirty days after such order is issued shall result in a waiver of all legal rights to contest the violation or the amount of penalty under section 34-33-128.

If, after board review or judicial review of the fixed penalty, it is determined that no violation occurred or that the amount of the penalty should be reduced, the board shall, within thirty days of such determination, remit the appropriate amount to the operator with interest at the rate prevailing in the escrow account established under paragraph (f) of this subsection (8).

Civil penalties owed under this section may be recovered in a civil action brought by the attorney general at the request of the board in the district court of this state for the district in which any of the affected land is located or in such other district agreeable to all parties to such action.

Any operator who fails to correct a violation for which a notice or cessation order has been issued under this section within the period permitted for its correction, which period shall not end until the entry of an order of the court, in the case of any review proceedings under section 34-33-128 initiated by the operator wherein the court orders the suspension of the abatement requirements of the citation, shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars for each day during which such failure or violation continues.

Any operator who willfully and knowingly violates a condition of a permit or fails or refuses to comply with any order issued under this section or any order incorporated in a final decision issued by the board under this article, except a notice and order issued under paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of this section or an order issued under paragraph (f) of subsection (8) of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Whenever a corporate operator violates a condition of a permit or fails or refuses to comply with any order issued under this section or any order incorporated in a final decision issued by the board under this article, except a notice and order issued under paragraph (d) of subsection (8) of this section or an order issued under paragraph (f) of subsection (8) of this section, any director, officer, or agent of such corporation who willfully and knowingly authorized, ordered, or carried out such violation, failure, or refusal shall be subject to the same civil penalties, fines, and imprisonment that may be imposed upon an operator under subsections (8) and (9) of this section.

Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification or knowingly fails to make any statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this article or any order or decision issued by the board or office under this article shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

The board or office may request the attorney general to institute a civil action for relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or any other appropriate order in the district court of this state for the district in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation is located or in which the permittee thereof has its principal office, whenever such permittee or an agent of such permittee violates or fails or refuses to comply with any order or decision issued by the board or office under this article, or interferes with, hinders, or delays the board or office in carrying out the provisions of this article, or refuses to admit an authorized representative of the office to the mine, or refuses to permit inspection of the mine by such representative, or refuses to furnish any information or report requested by the office or board in furtherance of the provisions of this article, or refuses to permit access to, and copying of, such records as the office or board determines necessary in carrying out the provisions of this article. Such court shall have jurisdiction to provide such relief as may be appropriate. Temporary restraining orders shall be issued in accordance with rule 65 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Any relief granted by the court to enforce an order based on a violation or failure or refusal to comply with any order or decision issued by the board or office under this article shall continue in effect until the completion or final termination of all proceedings for review of such order under this article, unless, prior thereto, the district court granting such relief sets it aside or modifies it.

When the office determines that it improvidently issued a permit that should not have been issued under the criteria set forth in section 34-33-114 (3), it shall implement remedial measures, including development of a cooperative plan with the permittee, imposition of a condition on the permit to correct the reason that the permit should not have been issued under section 34-33-114 (3), or issuance of an order to the permittee to show cause why the permit should not be suspended or revoked.

When an order to show cause is issued pursuant to this subsection (13), the order shall include the reasons for the finding that the permit was improvidently issued and shall provide an opportunity for a public hearing before the board to be held in accordance with section 34-33-124 and pursuant to rules the board may adopt. Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be no less effective than the federal rules provided in 30 CFR 773.21.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1288, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(4) and (8)(d) amended, p. 1682, § 5, effective June 16.

L. 92:

(1) to (3), (5) to (7), (8)(b), (8)(d) to (8)(f), (11), and (12) amended, p. 1962, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(13) added, p. 149, § 5, effective April 7.

34-33-124. Review by board.

An operator issued any notice of violation or cessation order pursuant to the provisions of section 34-33-123 or any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected by such notice or order or by any modification, vacation, or termination of such notice or order may request review thereof by the board within ninety days after the issuance of the notice or order or within ninety days after its modification, vacation, or termination. Such request for review may include a request for a hearing to enable the operator or such person to present information relating to the issuance and continuance of such notice or order or the modification, vacation, or termination thereof. Upon receipt of such request for a hearing, the hearing shall be held and, prior to such hearing, the board shall cause an investigation to be made as it deems appropriate. The filing of a request for review under this paragraph (a) shall not operate as a stay of any order or notice.

The operator, any other persons requesting a hearing, and all other persons expressing an interest shall be given written notice of the time and place of any hearing requested under this section at least five days prior to such hearing. Notice of such hearings shall also be included in the monthly mailings of the division. Any such hearing shall be of record and shall be subject to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Upon receiving the report of any investigation and after any public hearing under paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, the board shall make findings of fact and shall issue a written decision, incorporating therein its findings and an order vacating, affirming, modifying, or terminating the notice of violation or cessation order or the modification, vacation, or termination of such notice or order reviewed. Where the request for review concerns an order for cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations issued pursuant to section 34-33-123, the board shall issue a written decision within thirty days of the receipt of the request for review unless temporary relief has been granted by the board pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, by the office pursuant to section 34-33-123 (6), or by the court pursuant to section 34-33-128 (3).

Pending completion of the investigation and hearing under this section, the operator or any other party may file with the board a written request that the board grant temporary relief from any notice or order, together with a detailed statement giving reasons for granting such relief. The board shall issue an order or decision granting or denying such relief expeditiously; except that, where the operator requests relief from an order for cessation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations issued pursuant to section 34-33-123, the order or decision on such a request shall be issued within five days of its receipt. The board may grant such relief under such conditions as it may prescribe if:

An informal hearing has been held in the locality of the permit area on the request for temporary relief in which all parties were given an opportunity to be heard;

The party requesting temporary relief shows that there is substantial likelihood that the findings of the board will be favorable to him; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the health or safety of the public or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

Following the issuance of an order to show cause as to why a permit should not be suspended or revoked pursuant to section 34-33-123 (7), the board shall hold a public hearing after giving written notice of the time, place, and date thereof to the permittee. Advance notice of such hearing shall be included in the monthly mailings of the office. Any such hearing shall be of record and shall be subject to the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. Within sixty days following the public hearing, the board shall issue and furnish to the permittee and all other parties to the hearing a written decision, and the reasons therefor, concerning suspension or revocation of the permit. If the board suspends or revokes the permit, the permittee shall immediately cease those surface coal mining operations on the permit area as specified by the board and shall complete reclamation within a period specified by the board, or the board shall declare the performance bonds for the operation as forfeited. Proceeds of forfeited bonds shall be available to the office and shall be used by the office for reclamation of the area covered by the bond.

Whenever an order is issued under this section or as a result of any administrative proceeding under this article, at the request of any party to such proceeding, a sum equal to the aggregate amount of all costs and expenses (including attorney fees) which the board determines to have been reasonably incurred by such party for or in connection with his participation in such proceedings may be assessed against any party to the proceedings, as the board deems just and proper.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1293, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(b), IP(3), and (3)(b) amended, pp. 1683, 1684, §§ 6, 7, effective June 16.

L. 92:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 1965, § 67, effective July 1.

34-33-125. Release of performance bonds or deposits.

The permittee may file a request with the office for the release of all or part of a performance bond or deposit. The permittee shall submit with such request a copy of a publication to be placed by the permittee at least once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining operation. Such publication shall be considered part of any bond release application and shall contain a notification of the precise location of the land affected, the number of acres, the permit and the date approved, the amount of the bond filed and the portion sought to be released, the type and appropriate dates of reclamation work performed, and a description of the results achieved as they relate to the operator's approved reclamation plan. In addition, the operator shall, prior to the filing of a request for release of performance bond or deposit, provide written notice of such operator's intention to seek release from the bond to adjoining property owners and appropriate local government bodies, municipalities, regional planning commissions, boards of county commissioners, county planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, and water conservancy and water conservation districts in the locality in which the surface coal mining operations took place, and copies of such notifications shall be submitted to the office within thirty days of the filing of any request for release under this section.

Upon receipt of a request for the release of a performance bond or deposit, the office shall, within thirty days or as soon thereafter as weather conditions permit, conduct an inspection and evaluation of the reclamation work involved. Such evaluation shall consider, among other things, the results of inspections and monitoring conducted pursuant to section 34-33-122, the degree of difficulty to complete any remaining reclamation, and whether pollution of surface or subsurface water is occurring, the probability of continued pollution, and the estimated cost of abating such pollution. The written results of such inspection and evaluation shall be made immediately available for public inspection in the offices of the office of mined land reclamation.

Any person with a valid legal interest which might be adversely affected by release of the bond or any federal, state, or local government agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the operation, or is authorized to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to such operations, shall have the right to file written objections to or comments upon the requested release from bond with the office within thirty days after the last publication of the notice required in subsection (1) of this section. Upon receipt of any such objections or comments, copies thereof shall be transmitted to the permittee.

The office shall provide written notification to the permittee of its proposed decision to release or not release all or part of the performance bond or deposit together with written reasons for such proposed decision within sixty days from the date of completion of the inspection and evaluation as required in subsection (2) of this section. The office shall further publish written notice of its proposed decision once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining operation and shall immediately provide written notification of its proposed decision by certified mail to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the surface coal mining operation is located.

If no request for an adjudicatory hearing as provided in subsection (6) of this section is received within the time periods specified therefor, the proposed decision of the office shall be final.

The board shall hold an adjudicatory hearing on the proposed decision of the office upon the receipt of a written request for hearing from any person with a valid legal interest which might be adversely affected by the proposed decision of the office or from the responsible officer or head of any federal, state, or local government agency which has jurisdiction by law or special expertise with respect to any environmental, social, or economic impact involved in the operation or which is authorized to develop and enforce environmental standards with respect to such operations. The request for an adjudicatory hearing must state with specificity the reasons why the hearing is requested and must be received within thirty days of issuance of the proposed decision of the office. Prior to the adjudicatory hearing, the board shall inform all interested parties of the time and place of the hearing and shall publish the date, time, and location of such hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining operation for two consecutive weeks after receipt of a request for hearing. The board shall hold an adjudicatory hearing on the proposed decision of the office within thirty days of the receipt of any written request for such hearing and shall render a written decision affirming or reversing, in whole or in part, the decision of the office within thirty days following the conclusion of the adjudicatory hearing.

The adjudicatory hearing on the proposed decision of the office shall be conducted pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., and, for the purpose of such hearing, the board shall have the authority and is hereby empowered to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses or written or printed materials, compel the attendance of witnesses or production of the materials, and take evidence, including, but not limited to, inspections of the land affected and other surface coal mining operations carried on by the applicant in the general vicinity. A verbatim record of each adjudicatory hearing required by this article shall be made and a transcript made available on the request of any party to such hearing or by order of the board.

Without prejudice to the rights of any person which might be adversely affected, the applicant, or the responsibilities of the office pursuant to this section, the office may hold an informal conference as provided in section 34-33-118 to resolve any written comments or objections on the request for release, if such conference concludes by the sixtieth day following the inspection and evaluation required in subsection (2) of this section.

The bond or deposit shall be released, in whole or in part, if the office, or the board where an adjudicatory hearing is held pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, is satisfied the reclamation covered by the bond or deposit or portion thereof has been accomplished as required by this article, according to the following schedule:

Up to sixty percent of the bond or collateral for the applicable permit area shall be released when the operator completes backfilling, regrading, and drainage control of a bonded area in accordance with his approved reclamation plan;

An additional portion of the bond or collateral shall be released when revegetation has been established on the regraded mined lands in accordance with the approved reclamation plan. When determining the amount of bond to be released after successful revegetation has been established, the board or office shall retain that amount of the bond for the revegetated area which would be sufficient for a third party to cover the cost of reestablishing revegetation and for the period specified for operator responsibility in section 34-33-120 of reestablishing revegetation. No part of the bond or deposit shall be released under this paragraph (b) so long as the lands to which the release would be applicable are contributing suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area in excess of the requirements set by section 34-33-120 (2)(j) or until soil productivity for prime farmlands has returned to equivalent levels of yield as nonmined land of the same soil type in the surrounding area under equivalent management practices as determined from the soil survey performed pursuant to section 34-33-110 (2)(q). Where a silt dam is to be retained as a permanent impoundment pursuant to section 34-33-120 (2)(h), a portion of the bond may be released under this paragraph (b) so long as provisions for sound future maintenance by the operator or the landowner have been made with the office.

The remaining portion of the bond shall be released when the operator has successfully completed all surface coal mining and reclamation operations, but not before the expiration of the period specified for operator responsibility in section 34-33-120; except that no bond shall be fully released until all reclamation requirements of this article are fully met.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1294, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4) and (8) amended, p. 1895, § 3, effective May 29; (1) to (8), IP(9), and (9)(b) amended, p. 1965, § 68, effective July 1.